District of Columbia statutes.
20-905

Manner of presentation of claim.

(a)

A claimant shall present a claim against a decedent’s estate by delivering or mailing, return receipt requested, a written statement of the claim, verified in accordance with section 20-102:

(1)

to the personal representative with a copy to the Register; or

(2)

to the Register with a copy to the personal representative.

For purposes of presenting a claim within the 6-month time limits provided in section 20-903 , a claim shall be deemed presented if inadvertently it is only sent either to the personal representative or to the Register pursuant to this section.

(b)

A statement of a claim shall state:

(1)

the name and address of the claimant;

(2)

the basis of the claim;

(3)

the amount claimed;

(4)

if the claim is not yet due, when the claim will become due;

(5)

if the claim is contingent, the nature of the contingency; and

(6)

if the claim is secured, a description of the security.

(c)

The Court may, in its discretion, disallow a claim, in whole or in part, if the claimant fails to comply with subsections (a) and (b) or with the personal representative’s reasonable requests for additional information.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(fff), 42 DCR 63

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-343, § 20-903, § 20-908, and § 20-910.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-905.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of § 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, see § 2 of the Probate Reform Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-79, June 28, 1995, 42 DCR 3452).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: Section 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, as amended by § 2 of D.C. Law 11-54, provided that the act shall be applicable to estates of decedents who died on or after July 1, 1995.